pt-PT: Ajustabilidade da dobadoura: Ajustável (expansível); Ajustável e dobrável; Retrátil/dobrável; Tamanho fixo; Outro
pt-BR: Dobadeira de fio ajustabilidade: Ajustável (expansível); Ajustável e dobrável; Dobrável/recolhível; Tamanho fixo; Outros
vi: Khả năng điều chỉnh nhanh chóng của sợi: Có thể điều chỉnh (có thể mở rộng); Có thể điều chỉnh và thu gọn; Có thể thu gọn/gấp gọn; Kích thước cố định; Khác
tr: Çıkrık sehpası ayarlanabilirliği: Ayarlanabilir (genişletilebilir); Ayarlanabilir ve katlanabilir; Katlanabilir; Sabit boyutlu; Diğer
sk-SK: Možnosť nastavenia nástroja na odvíjanie priadze: Nastaviteľné (roztiahnuteľné); Nastaviteľné a skladacie; Skladacie; Pevná veľkosť; Iné
da: Justerbarhed for garnvinde: Justerbar (udvidelig); Justerbar og foldbar; Sammenklappelig/foldbar; Fast størrelse; Andet
en: Yarn swift adjustability: Adjustable (expandable); Adjustable and collapsible; Collapsible/Foldable; Fixed size; Other
ko: 얀 스위프트 조절 기능: 조절 가능(확장형); 조절 및 접기 가능; 접이식; 고정 사이즈; 기타
it: Regolabilità del cavalletto avvolgifilo: Regolabile (espandibile); Regolabile e pieghevole; Pieghevole; Misura fissa; Altro
sl-SI: Hitra nastavljivost preje: Nastavljivo (raztegljivo); Nastavljivo in zložljivo; Zložljivo; Fiksna velikost; Drugo
lt-LT: Greitas siūlų reguliavimas: Reguliuojamas (išplečiamas); Reguliuojamas ir sulankstomas; Sudedamas / sulankstomas; Fiksuoto dydžio; Kita
hu: Fonalgombolyító állíthatósága: Állítható (bővíthető); Állítható és összecsukható; Összecsukható/hajtogatható; Fix méret; Egyéb
ru: Регулируемость моталки для пряжи: Регулируемая (раздвижная); Регулируемая и складная; Складная; Фиксированный размер; Другая
el: Δυνατότητα ρύθμισης ανέμης νήματος: Ρυθμιζόμενο (επεκτεινόμενο); Ρυθμιζόμενο και πτυσσόμενο; Πτυσσόμενο/Αναδιπλούμενο; Σταθερό μέγεθος; Άλλο
hr-HR: Brza podesljivost pređe: Podesivo (proširivo); Podesivo i sklopivo; Sklopivo; Fiksna veličina; Ostalo
th: ความสามารถในการปรับระดับของรอกด้าย: ปรับได้ (ยืดขยายได้); ปรับได้และพับเก็บได้; ยุบตัวได้/พับเก็บได้; ขนาดตายตัว; อื่นๆ
es: Ajustabilidad del carrete de hilo: Ajustable (expandible); Ajustable y plegable; Plegable/abatible; Tamaño fijo; Otro
ja: 糸巻き台の調整機能: 調整可能 (拡張式); 調整および折りたたみ可能; 折りたたみ可能; 固定サイズ; その他
zh-CN: 纱线框调节: 可调节（可扩展）; 可调节且可折叠; 可折叠; 固定尺寸; 其他
bg-BG: Регулируемост на държача за прежда: Регулируем (разширяем); Регулируем и сгъваем; Сгъваем; Фиксиран размер; Други
fr: Possibilités de réglage du dévidoir à laine: Réglable (extensible); Réglable et pliable; Pliable/rabattable; Taille fixe; Autre
nb: Justerbarhet på garnspolen: Justerbar (utvidbar); Justerbar og sammenleggbar; Sammenleggbar/brettbar; Fast størrelse; Annet
zh-TW: 絞紗框可調整性: 可調 (可擴充); 可調且可折疊; 可折疊; 固定尺寸; 其他
sv: Garnvindans justerbarhet: Justerbar (expanderbar); Justerbar och hopfällbar; Hopfällbar/vikbar; Fast storlek; Övrigt
fi: Vyyhdinpuun säädettävyys: Säädettävä (laajennettava); Säädettävä ja kokoontaittuva; Kokoontaittuva/taitettava; Kiinteä koko; Muu
ro-RO: Reglaj de vârtelniță pentru fire: Ajustabil (extensibil); Ajustabil și pliabil; Pliabil; Dimensiune fixă; Altele
cs: Nastavitelnost odvíječe příze: Nastavitelné (roztažitelné); Nastavitelné a skládací; Skládací; Pevná velikost; Jiné
nl: Aanpasbaarheid van de garensnelspanner: Verstelbaar (uitschuifbaar); Verstelbaar en inklapbaar; Inklapbaar/opvouwbaar; Vaste maat; Overig
pl: Regulacja motowidła do włóczki: Regulowany (rozszerzalny); Regulowany i składany; Składany; Rozmiar stały; Inne
de: Einstellbarkeit des Garnwicklers: Verstellbar (erweiterbar); Verstellbar und zusammenklappbar; Zusammenklappbar/Faltbar; Feste Größe; Sonstige